Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.400.309

K-12 criminal background check account.

The K-12 criminal background check account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All fees collected by the office of the superintendent of public instruction pursuant to RCW 28A.400.303 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the purpose of administering the office of the superintendent of public instruction's duties under RCW 28A.400.303 and 28A.410.010. Only the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee may authorize expenditures from the account. The account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW, but an appropriation is not required for expenditures.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 33 s 5.]